Utah statutes.
77-38a-201.   Restitution determination -- Law enforcement duties and
responsibilities.
Any law enforcement agency conducting an investigation for criminal conduct
which would constitute a felony or class A misdemeanor shall provide in the
investigative reports whether a claim for restitution exists, the basis for
the claim, and the estimated or actual amount of the claim.
